finished/cpa.foma
source canonicalize.foma

#define alphabet & parts
def Alphabet [% |%(|%)|%+|%-|2|a|b|c|d|e|g|h|i|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|u|²|³|¹|á|é|í|ó|ø|ú|ē|ǿ|Ɂ|ḗ];
def V [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ø|ú|ē|ǿ|ḗ];
def C [b|c|d|g|h|k|l|m|n|r|s|t|Ɂ];
def Tone [²|³|¹];    
def Misc [% |%(|%)|%+|%-];



### LEXICON ###



#open defined lexicon
read lexc cpa.lexc
eliminate flags
def LexGrammar;



### GUESSER ###

#need to remove second word from stem
def Stem Alphabet+ .o. [" " ?+] @->0 || " " _ .#.;

#Guesser is also "Class 4" - no vowels changes, no letter changes, no tone changes, only prefixes and accent loss.
def RawGuesser [
       "[PRS]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[2]"]:A |
       "[PST]":{mi³-} Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[2]"]:A |
       "[PRS]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[3]"]:0 |
       "[PST]":{mi³-} Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[3]"]:0 |
       "[PRS]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[PL]" "[1]"]:A |
       "[PST]":{mi³-} Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[PL]" "[1]"]:A |
       "[PRS]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:A |
       "[PST]":{mi³-} Stem ["[V]" "[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:A |
       "[FUT]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IRR]" "[2]"]:A |
       "[FUT]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IRR]" "[3]"]:0 |
       "[FUT]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IRR]" "[PL]" "[1]"]:A |
       "[FUT]":0      Stem ["[V]" "[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:A ];


def Grammar Canonicalize(LexGrammar) .P. Canonicalize(Guesser);


### PHONOTACTICS ###



## TONE ## 


#tone changes as marked in lexc
def X3End [Tone+ X3E] @-> ³ ;  
def X2End [Tone+ X2E] @-> ² ;  
def X1End [Tone+ X1E] @-> ¹ ;
def 12End [Tone+ 12E] @-> {¹²} ;     
def 13End [Tone+ 13E] @-> {¹³} ;     
def X3Mid Tone -> ³ || _ %+ [?]* [3M] ;  
def X1Mid Tone -> ¹ || _ %+ [?]* [1M] ;

def ToneChange X3End .o. X2End .o. X1End .o. 12End .o. 13End .o. X3Mid .o. X1Mid;


## ACCENT ##


#replace accented vowels with unaccented surface forms when marked by A
def AccLoss1 ǿ -> ø || _ ?* A ;
def AccLoss2 é -> e || _ ?* A ;
def AccLoss3 á -> a || _ ?* A ;
def AccLoss4 ó -> o || _ ?* A ;
def AccLoss5 ḗ -> ē || _ ?* A ; 
#def AccLoss6 ē -> e || _ ?* A ; #removed b/c too many exceptions
def AccLoss7 ú -> u || _ ?* A ;
def AccLoss8 í -> i || _ ?* A ;

def AccLoss AccLoss1 .o. AccLoss2 .o. AccLoss3 .o. AccLoss4 .o. AccLoss5 .o. AccLoss7 .o. AccLoss8;


## LETTER ##


#address letter changes/deletions here, vowel or consonant
def TSshift1 {ts} -> {ch} || _i;
def TSshift2 {ts} -> h || _[ø|u];

def OIshift {ǿi} -> {ai} || [[Ɂ ?] | {ng}] _ Tone+ A;
def AIshift a -> {ia} || _ C+ ¹ ³; 
#def AEshift a -> e || _ [C ¹ #]; 


def Lett TSshift1 .o. TSshift2 .o. OIshift .o. AIshift;



### CLEANUP & COMPILATION ###



#remove temporary markers
def Cleanup [3M | 1M | A] -> 0;


regex Canonicalize(Grammar) .o. ToneChange .o. AccLoss .o. Lett .o. Cleanup; 
save stack cpa.fomabin
